Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0528.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3216. (1) The A sale shall of mortgaged property under this chapter must be conducted at a public sale, held between the hour of 9 o'clock in the forenoon and 4 o'clock in the afternoon, at 9:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. The sale may be conducted in either of the following ways: (a) In person at the place of holding where the circuit court within is held in the county in which the premises to be sold, or some part of them, are situated, and shall the premises, is located. (b) Online. The person conducting the sale shall ensure that the online auction platform used is secure, reliable, and accessible to all interested bidders. The amount bid by the highest bidder in an online sale must be paid within 24 hours after the sale, not including any time in a weekend day or a holiday in the 24 hours, for the person conducting the sale to execute, acknowledge, and deliver a deed under section 3232. (2) The sale under subsection (1) must be made by the person appointed for that purpose in the mortgage, or by the sheriff, undersheriff, or a deputy sheriff of the county, to the highest bidder. Sec. 3220. (1) Such A sale of mortgaged property under this chapter may be adjourned from time to time, by the sheriff or other officer or person appointed to make such the sale, at the request of the party in whose name the notice of sale is published by posting a notice of such the adjournment before or at the time of and at the place where said the sale. (2) Unless the sale is to be made , and if any online, the notice of adjournment under this section must be posted at the place where the sale is to be conducted. If the sale is to be made online, the notice of adjournment must be posted in a highly visible manner on the platform on which the sale was to be conducted and on the website of the county on which notice of the sale was previously posted, and must be given by any other means that the notice of sale was previously given under section 3208(3). (3) If an adjournment be of a sale under this section is for more than 1 week at one time, the notice thereof, appended to of adjournment and the original notice of sale , shall must also be published in the newspaper in which the original notice was published, the first publication to be within 10 days of the date from which the sale was adjourned and thereafter after the first publication once in each full secular week during the time for which such the sale shall be is adjourned. No (4) An oral announcement of any an adjournment shall be under this section is not necessary. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 527 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.